Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 11 Wyoming Court Security Act

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 114, § 2, provides:

“(a)

There is appropriated from the general fund for the biennium beginning July 1, 2008:

“(i)

Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) to the supreme court to pay expenses incurred under W.S. 5-11-101(b), created by this act;

“(ii)

Four thousand six hundred dollars ($4,600.00) to the legislative service office to pay expenses incurred under W.S. 5-11-101(c), created by this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 114, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 5-11-101.
Wyoming
court security commission created; membership; powers and duties;
compensation; report required.

The Wyoming court security commission is created under the supervision of the Wyoming supreme court. The commission shall be composed of the director of the office of homeland security or his designee and nine (9) additional members who shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years commencing July 1, 2008, who may be reappointed to serve subsequent terms. The nine (9) additional members shall include:

One (1) justice of the Wyoming supreme court, appointed by the chief justice;

One (1) district court judge, appointed by the board of judicial policy and administration;

One (1) circuit court judge, appointed by the board of judicial policy and administration;

One (1) county commissioner, appointed by the governor;

One (1) county sheriff, appointed by the governor;

One (1) representative of the Wyoming peace officer’s standards and training commission, appointed by the governor;

Two (2) legislators, one (1) from each house, appointed by the speaker of the house and president of the senate respectively;

One (1) district attorney or county attorney, appointed by the governor.

Nonlegislative members of the commission shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on the commission.

The legislative members shall receive salary and reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on the commission, as provided in W.S.

28-5-101

.

The commission shall meet at least two (2) times per year.

The commission shall:

Establish standards to protect life, property and the judicial process in the Wyoming court system. In establishing the standards, the commission shall recommend proper levels of court security to each county with due consideration of each county’s size, use of court facilities and security risks. The standards shall include:

Requirements concerning equipment, facilities and architecture for court security purposes;

Basic training requirements for peace officers authorized to act as court security officers;

Basic protocol and procedures for court security; and

Requirements for the establishment of local court security management committees.

Visit and inspect any court security program at any appropriate time;

Recommend to the legislature the distribution of funds to counties as may from time to time be appropriated by the legislature for the provision of court security;

Report no later than September 1, 2009, and annually thereafter to the governor, chief justice of the supreme court, joint judiciary interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee on the status of court security in the state.

The supreme court shall provide necessary administrative support for the commission.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 114, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 114, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.